Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.220

Director—Powers.

The director or the director's designee is authorized:

(1) To promulgate and maintain the Washington heritage register of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in American or Washington state history, architecture, archaeology, and culture, and to prepare comprehensive statewide historic surveys and plans and research and evaluation of surveyed resources for the preparation of nominations to the Washington heritage register and the national register of historic places, in accordance with criteria approved by the advisory council established under RCW 27.34.250. Nominations to the national register of historic places shall comply with any standards and regulations promulgated by the United States secretary of the interior for the preservation, acquisition, and development of such properties. Nominations to the Washington heritage register shall comply with rules adopted under this chapter.

(2) To establish a program of matching grants-in-aid to public agencies, public or private organizations, or individuals for projects having as their purpose the preservation for public benefit of properties that are significant in American or Washington state history, architecture, archaeology, and culture.

(3) To promote historic preservation efforts throughout the state, including private efforts and those of city, county, and state agencies.

(4) To enhance the effectiveness of the state preservation program through the initiation of legislation, the use of varied funding sources, the creation of special purpose programs, and contact with state, county, and city officials, civic groups, and professionals.

(5) To spend funds, subject to legislative appropriation and the availability of funds, where necessary to assist the Indian tribes of Washington state in removing prehistoric human remains for scientific examination and reburial, if the human remains have been unearthed inadvertently or through vandalism and if no other public agency is legally responsible for their preservation.

(6) To consult with the governor and the legislature on issues relating to the conservation of the man-made environment and their impact on the well-being of the state and its citizens.

(7) To charge fees for professional and clerical services provided by the *office.

(8) To adopt such rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, as are necessary to carry out RCW 27.34.200 through 27.34.280.

[ 1997 c 145 s 1; 1987 c 505 s 8; 1986 c 266 s 11; 1985 c 64 s 2; 1983 c 91 s 12.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Powers, duties, and functions of the office of archaeology and historic preservation were transferred to the department of archaeology and historic preservation pursuant to 2005 c 333 s 12.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.